Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1308
Failure to stop at weighing station or portable scale; violation; penalty.

The driver of any motor truck, truck-tractor, semitrailer, trailer, or towed vehicle who fails to obey any sign, message board, or in-cab signal from any state weighing station or portable scale or who knowingly passes or bypasses any state weighing station or portable scale, when the station or scale is open and being operated by an officer of the Nebraska State Patrol, is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1955, c. 145, § 8, p. 408;

Laws 1959, c. 302, § 1, p. 1130;

Laws 1963, c. 373, § 8, p. 1199;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 91;

Laws 1985, LB 395, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 481, § 1.